Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-135.01
Claims; false statements or representations; penalties.

Whoever shall file any claim against any county as provided in section 23-135, knowing said claim to contain any false statement or representation as to a material fact or whoever shall obtain or receive any money or any warrant for money from any county knowing that the claim therefor was based on a false statement or representation as to a material fact, if the amount claimed or money obtained or received, or if the face value of the warrant for money shall be one thousand dollars or more shall be guilty of a Class IV felony. If the amount is more than one hundred dollars but less than one thousand dollars, the person so offending shall be guilty of a Class II misdemeanor. If the amount is less than one hundred dollars, the person so offending shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1957, c. 59, § 2, p. 277;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 84.

Mere negligence on part of claimant is not enough to sustain a conviction hereunder. State ex rel. Nebraska State Bar Assn. v. Holscher, 193 Neb. 729, 230 N.W.2d 75 (1975).